Ohio, session 136, SB429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4513.34 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 4513.34. (A)(1) The director of transportation with respect to all highways that are a part of the state highway system and local authorities with respect to highways under their jurisdiction, upon application in writing, shall issue a special regional heavy hauling permit authorizing the applicant to operate or move a vehicle or combination of vehicles as follows: (a) At a size or weight of vehicle or load exceeding the maximum specified in sections 5577.01 to 5577.09 of the Revised Code, or otherwise not in conformity with sections 4513.01 to 4513.37 of the Revised Code; (b) Upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the authority granting the permit except those highways with a condition insufficient to bear the weight of the vehicle or combination of vehicles as stated in the application. Issuance of a special regional heavy hauling permit is subject to the payment of a fee established by the director or local authority in accordance with this section. (2) In circumstances where a person is not eligible to receive a permit under division (A)(1) of this section, the director of transportation with respect to all highways that are a part of the state highway system and local authorities with respect to highways under their jurisdiction, upon application in writing and for good cause shown, may issue a special permit in writing authorizing the applicant to operate or move a vehicle or combination of vehicles of a size or weight of vehicle or load exceeding the maximum specified in sections 5577.01 to 5577.09 of the Revised Code, or otherwise not in conformity with sections 4513.01 to 4513.37 of the Revised Code, upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the authority granting the permit. (3) For purposes of this section, the director may designate certain state highways or portions of state highways as special economic development highways. If an application submitted to the director under this section involves travel of a nonconforming vehicle or combination of vehicles upon a special economic development highway, the director, in determining whether good cause has been shown that issuance of a permit is justified, shall consider the effect the travel of the vehicle or combination of vehicles will have on the economic development in the area in which the designated highway or portion of highway is located. (B)(1) Notwithstanding sections 715.22 and 723.01 of the Revised Code, the holder of a permit issued by the director under this section may move the vehicle or combination of vehicles described in the permit on any highway that is a part of the state highway system when the movement is partly within and partly without the corporate limits of a municipal corporation. No local authority shall require any other permit or license or charge any license fee or other charge against the holder of a permit for the movement of a vehicle or combination of vehicles on any highway that is a part of the state highway system. The director shall not require the holder of a permit issued by a local authority to obtain a special permit for the movement of vehicles or combination of vehicles on highways within the jurisdiction of the local authority. (2) Except as provided in division (B)(3) of this section, permits may be issued for any period of time not to exceed one year, as the director in the director's discretion or a local authority in its discretion determines advisable, or for the duration of any public construction project. (3) The director and every county shall issue an annual permit under division (A)(2) of this section for: (a) A vehicle or combination of vehicles that haul farm machinery, provided that the farm machinery otherwise qualifies for the farm equipment permit or a similar permit offered by the county for farm machinery or equipment; (b) A vehicle or combination of vehicles that haul agricultural produce or agricultural production materials that otherwise could be hauled by farm machinery or equipment under the farm equipment permit or a similar permit offered by the county for farm machinery or equipment. (4) In addition to the annual permit issued under division (B)(3) of this section, the director and every county may continue to issue a permit under division (A)(2) of this section for the vehicles specified in division (B)(3) of this section, for any period of time up to one year. (5) If the director issues a permit with respect to farm machinery or farm equipment, the director shall not require a law enforcement escort if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The permit holder operates the farm machinery or farm equipment on a state route other than an interstate highway. (b) The permit holder moves the farm machinery or farm equipment a distance that is less than ten miles. (c) The permit holder receives written permission to operate the farm machinery or farm equipment without a law enforcement escort from the county sheriff of any county with jurisdiction over the applicable portion of the state highway. (C)(1) The application for a permit issued under this section shall be in the form that the director or local authority prescribes. The director or local authority may prescribe a permit fee to be imposed and collected when any permit described in this section is issued. The permit fee may be in an amount sufficient to reimburse the director or local authority for the administrative costs incurred in issuing the permit, and also to cover the cost of the normal and expected damage caused to the roadway or a street or highway structure as the result of the operation of the nonconforming vehicle or combination of vehicles. The director, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall establish a schedule of fees for permits issued by the director under this section; however, the fee to operate a triple trailer unit, at locations authorized under federal law, shall be one hundred dollars. (2) For the purposes of this section and of rules adopted by the director under this section, milk transported in bulk by vehicle is deemed a nondivisible load. (3) For purposes of this section and of rules adopted by the director under this section, three or fewer aluminum coils, transported by a vehicle, are deemed a nondivisible load. The director shall adopt rules establishing requirements for an aluminum coil permit that are substantially similar to the requirements for a steel coil permit under Chapter 5501:2-1 of the Administrative Code. (D) The director or a local authority shall issue a special regional heavy hauling permit under division (A)(1) of this section upon application and payment of the applicable fee. Except when required to issue a special permit under division (B)(3) of this section, the director or local authority may issue or withhold a special permit specified in division (A)(2) of this section. If a permit is to be issued, the director or local authority may limit or prescribe conditions of operation for the vehicle and may require the posting of a bond or other security conditioned upon the sufficiency of the permit fee to compensate for damage caused to the roadway or a street or highway structure. In addition, a local authority, as a condition of issuance of an overweight permit, may require the applicant to develop and enter into a mutual agreement with the local authority to compensate for or to repair excess damage caused to the roadway by travel under the permit. For a permit that will allow travel of a nonconforming vehicle or combination of vehicles on a special economic development highway, the director, as a condition of issuance, may require the applicant to agree to make periodic payments to the department to compensate for damage caused to the roadway by travel under the permit. (E) Every permit issued under this section shall be carried in the vehicle or combination of vehicles to which it refers and shall be open to inspection by any police officer or authorized agent of any authority granting the permit. No person shall violate any of the terms of a permit. (F) The director may debar an applicant from applying for a permit under this section upon a finding based on a reasonable belief that the applicant has done any of the following: (1) Abused the process by repeatedly submitting false information or false travel plans or by using another company or individual's name, insurance, or escrow account without proper authorization; (2) Failed to comply with or substantially perform under a previously issued permit according to its terms, conditions, and specifications within specified time limits; (3) Failed to cooperate in the application process for the permit or in any other procedures that are related to the issuance of the permit by refusing to provide information or documents required in a permit or by failing to respond to and correct matters related to the permit; (4) Accumulated repeated justified complaints regarding performance under a permit that was previously issued to the applicant or previously failed to obtain a permit when such a permit was required; (5) Attempted to influence a public employee to breach ethical conduct standards; (6) Been convicted of a disqualifying offense as determined under section 9.79 of the Revised Code; (7) Accumulated repeated convictions under a state or federal safety law governing commercial motor vehicles or a rule or regulation adopted under such a law; (8) Accumulated repeated convictions under a law, rule, or regulation governing the movement of traffic over the public streets and highways; (9) Failed to pay any fees associated with any permitted operation or move; (10) Deliberately or willfully submitted false or misleading information in connection with the application for, or performance under, a permit issued under this section. If the applicant is a partnership, association, or corporation, the director also may debar from consideration for permits any partner of the partnership, or the officers, directors, or employees of the association or corporation being debarred. The director may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing the debarment of an applicant. (G) When the director reasonably believes that grounds for debarment exist, the director shall send the person that is subject to debarment a notice of the proposed debarment. A notice of proposed debarment shall indicate the grounds for the debarment of the person and the procedure for requesting a hearing. The notice and hearing shall be in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the person does not respond with a request for a hearing in the manner specified in that chapter, the director shall issue the debarment decision without a hearing and shall notify the person of the decision by certified mail, return receipt requested. The debarment period may be of any length determined by the director, and the director may modify or rescind the debarment at any time. During the period of debarment, the director shall not issue, or consider issuing, a permit under this section to any partnership, association, or corporation that is affiliated with a debarred person. After the debarment period expires, the person, and any partnership, association, or corporation affiliated with the person, may reapply for a permit. (H)(1) No person shall violate the terms of a permit issued under this section that relate to gross load limits. (2) No person shall violate the terms of a permit issued under this section that relate to axle load by more than two thousand pounds per axle or group of axles. (3) No person shall violate the terms of a permit issued under this section that relate to an approved route except upon order of a law enforcement officer or authorized agent of the issuing authority. (I) Whoever violates division (H) of this section shall be punished as provided in section 4513.99 of the Revised Code. (J) A permit issued by the department of transportation or a local authority under this section for the operation of a vehicle or combination of vehicles is valid for the purposes of the vehicle operation in accordance with the conditions and limitations specified on the permit. Such a permit is voidable by law enforcement only for operation of a vehicle or combination of vehicles in violation of the weight, dimension, or route provisions of the permit. However, a permit is not voidable for operation in violation of a route provision of a permit if the operation is upon the order of a law enforcement officer. Section 2. That existing section 4513.34 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.